Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 2 Trustee Compensation

53-12-210.
Compensation of trustee.

Trustees shall be compensated in accordance with either the trust instrument or any separate written agreement between the trustee and the settlor. After the settlor’s death or incapacity or while the trust is irrevocable, the trust instrument or the agreement relating to such trustee’s compensation may be modified as follows:

The trustee and all qualified beneficiaries may by unanimous consent modify the trust instrument or agreement relating to the trustee’s compensation without receiving the approval of any court; or

By petition pursuant to Code Section 53-12-61.

If there is no provision for trustee compensation in the trust instrument and there is no separate written agreement between the trustee and the settlor relating to such trustee’s compensation, a separate written agreement relating to such trustee’s compensation may be entered into between such trustee and the qualified beneficiaries as follows:

The trustee and all qualified beneficiaries may by unanimous consent enter into an agreement relating to such trustee’s compensation without receiving the approval of any court; or

Any qualified beneficiary may petition the court to approve an agreement relating to such trustee’s compensation. Such petition shall be served upon all qualified beneficiaries.

In cases other than those described in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, the trustee shall be entitled to compensation as follows:

With respect to a corporate trustee, its published fee schedule, provided that such fees are reasonable under the circumstances; and

With respect to an individual trustee:

One percent of cash and the fair market value of any other principal asset received upon the initial funding of the trust and at such time as additional principal assets are received; and

An annual fee calculated in accordance with the following schedule based upon the cash and the market value of the other principal assets valued as of the last day of the trust accounting year prorated based on the length of service by such trustee during that year:

Click to view

If the cash and market value of the other principal assets are: Annual fee: $500,000.00 or less 1.75 percent of the cash and market value of the other principal assets. More than $500,000.00 but not more than $1 million $8,750.00 plus 1.25 percent of the excess over $500,000.00. More than $1 million but not more than $2 million $15,000.00 plus 1.00 percent of the excess over $1 million. More than $2 million but not more than $5 million $25,000.00 plus 0.85 percent of the excess over $2 million. More than $5 million $50,500.00 plus 0.50 percent of the excess over $5 million.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-210

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 15/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-81/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “The trustee and all” for “All” at the beginning of paragraphs (a)(1) and (b)(1); substituted “or” for “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(1); inserted “that” in paragraph (c)(1); and substituted “not more” for “less” three times in the table in subparagraph (c)(2)(B).

Law reviews.

For article on the problems and benefits of multiple fiduciaries in estate planning, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 355 (1981).

For annual survey of law on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 365 (2010).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-12-211.
Compensation of cotrustees and successor trustees.

Unless any separate written agreement provides otherwise:

Each cotrustee shall be compensated as specified by the terms of the trust, as each trustee may have agreed or in accordance with a published fee schedule, and such compensation among cotrustees shall not be apportioned unless they shall agree otherwise; and

The annual fee paid pursuant to subparagraph (c)(2)(B) of Code Section 53-12-210 shall be apportioned among trustees and successor trustees according to the proportion of time each rendered services during the year.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-211

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 551, § 11/SB 134.

Law reviews.

For article on the problems and benefits of multiple fiduciaries in estate planning, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 355 (1981).

53-12-212.
Extra compensation.

A trustee who is receiving compensation as described in subsection (c) of Code Section 53-12-210 may petition the court for compensation that is greater than the compensation allowed under that subsection. Notice of the petition for extra compensation shall be given to all qualified beneficiaries.

After hearing any objection, the court shall allow such extra compensation as the court deems reasonable. The allowance of extra compensation shall be conclusive as to all parties in interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-212

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 16/HB 121.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

53-12-213.
Reimbursement of expenses.

A trustee shall be entitled to be reimbursed out of the trust property for reasonable expenses that were properly incurred in the administration of the trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-213

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-214.
Compensation from business enterprise.

Any trustee may receive compensation for services, as specified in this subsection, from a corporation or other business enterprise, where the trust estate owns an interest in the corporation or other business enterprise, provided that:

The services provided by the trustee to the corporation or other business enterprise are of a managerial, executive, or business advisory nature;

The compensation received for the services is reasonable; and

The services are performed and the trustee is paid pursuant to a contract executed by the trustee and the corporation or business enterprise, which contract is approved by a majority of those members of the board of directors or other similar governing authority of the corporation or business enterprise who are not officers or employees of the trustee and are not related to the trustee and provided, further, that the contract is approved by the court.

Any trustee receiving compensation from a corporation or other business enterprise for services to it as described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not receive extra compensation in respect to such services as provided in Code Section 53-12-212; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the receipt by the trustee of extra compensation for services rendered in respect to other assets or matters involving the trust estate.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the receipt by trustees of normal commissions and compensation for the usual services performed by trustees pursuant to law or pursuant to any fee agreement executed by the settlor.

The purpose of this Code section is to enable additional compensation to be paid to trustees for business management and advisory services to corporations and business enterprises pursuant to contract, without the necessity of petitioning for extra compensation pursuant to Code Section 53-12-212.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-214

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.